ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用品 > ラクロススティック: ラクロスゴーリー用スティック; ミニラクロススティック
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Lacrosse og udendørs hockey > Lacrossestave: Målmandsstave til lacrosse; Mini-lacrosse-stave
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Feldhockey & Lacrosse > Lacrosse-Schläger: Lacrosse-Torwartschläger; Mini-Lacrosse-Schläger
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gyeplabda és lacrosse > Lacrosse botok: Lacrosse kapusütők; Mini lacrosse ütők
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pozemní hokej a lakros > Lakrosové hole: Brankářské lakrosové hole; Mini lakrosové hole
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Hockey su prato e lacrosse > Mazze da lacrosse: Stecche da portiere di lacrosse; Mini stecche da lacrosse
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου & λακρός > Μπαστούνια λακρός: Μπαστούνια τερματοφύλακα λακρός; Μίνι μπαστούνια λακρός
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse > Crose de lacrosse: Crose de portar pentru lacrosse; Minicrose de lacrosse
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球 > 长曲棍球棒: 长曲棍球守门员球棍; 迷你长曲棍球棍
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Maahockey ja lacrosse > Lacrosse-mailat: Lacrosse-maalivahdin mailat; Minikokoiset lacrosse-mailat
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Landhockey och lacrosse > Lacrosseklubbor: Lacrosse-klubbor för målvakter; Mini-lacrosse-klubbor
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse > Palos de lacrosse: Palos de portero de lacrosse; Mini palos de lacrosse
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хокей на трева и лакрос > Стикове за лакрос: Вратарски стикове за лакрос; Мини лакрос стикове
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt > Cán bóng vợt: Gậy lacrosse cho thủ môn; Gậy lacrosse mini
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Landhockey og Lacrosse > Lacrossekøller: Lacrosse-køller for keepere; Mini-lacrosse-køller
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей на траве и лакросс > Клюшки для лакросса: Вратарские стики для лакросса; Мини-стики для лакросса
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Lacrosse e hóquei em campo > Sticks de lacrosse: Sticks de lacrosse para guarda-redes; Ministicks de lacrosse
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Hockey sur gazon et lacrosse > Crosses de lacrosse: Crosses de gardien de but de crosse; Mini-crosses de crosse
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Hóquei de campo e lacrosse > Bastões de lacrosse: Tacos de goleiro de lacrosse; Mini tacos de lacrosse
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส > ไม้ลาครอส: ไม้ลาครอสส์สำหรับโกล; ไม้ลาครอสส์ขนาดเล็ก
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Field Hockey & Lacrosse > Lacrosse Sticks: Lacrosse Goalie Sticks; Mini Lacrosse Sticks
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Pozemný hokej a lakros > Lakrosové palice: Brankárske hokejky na lakros; Palice na mini lakros
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Žolės riedulys ir lakrosas > Lakroso lazdos: Lakroso vartininko lazdos; Mini lakroso lazdos
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Hockey en lacrosse > Lacrossesticks: Lacrossesticks voor keepers; Minilacrossesticks
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Hokej na trawie i lacrosse > Kije do lacrosse: Kije dla bramkarzy do lacrosse; Mini kije do lacrosse
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros > Lakros Sopaları: Lakros kaleci sopaları; Mini lakros sopaları
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 草地曲棍球/袋棍球 > 袋棍球棒: 袋棍球守門員球桿; 迷你袋棍球球桿
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Hokej na travi i lacrosse > Palice za lacrosse: Palice za vratara za lacrosse; Palice za mini lacrosse
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 필드하키/라크로스 > 라크로스 스틱: 라크로스 골리 스틱; 미니 라크로스 스틱
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Hokej na travi in lacrosse > Lacrosse palice: Vratarske palice za lacrosse; Majhne palice za Lacrosse